Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.110

Fire protection—Duties of chief of the Washington state patrol.

Fire protection with respect to all birthing centers to be licensed hereunder, shall be the responsibility of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, who shall adopt by reference, such recognized standards as may be applicable to nursing homes, places of refuge, and birthing centers for the protection of life against the cause and spread of fire and fire hazards. The department upon receipt of an application for a license, shall submit to the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, in writing, a request for an inspection, giving the applicant's name and the location of the premises to be licensed. Upon receipt of such a request, the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, shall make an inspection of the birthing center to be licensed, and if it is found that the premises do not comply with the required safety standards and fire regulations as promulgated by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, he or she shall promptly make a written report to the department as to the manner in which the premises may qualify for a license and set forth the conditions to be remedied with respect to fire regulations. The department, applicant or licensee shall notify the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, upon completion of any requirements made by him or her, and the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, shall make a reinspection of such premises. Whenever the birthing center to be licensed meets with the approval of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, he or she shall submit to the department, a written report approving same with respect to fire protection before a license can be issued. The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall make or cause to be made such inspection of such birthing centers as he or she deems necessary.

In cities which have in force a comprehensive building code, the regulation of which is equal to the minimum standards of the code for birthing centers adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, the building inspector and the chief of the fire department, provided the latter is a paid chief of a paid fire department, shall make the inspection and shall approve the premises before a license can be issued.

In cities where such building codes are in force, the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, may, upon request by the chief fire official, or the local governing body, or of a taxpayer of such city, assist in the enforcement of any such code pertaining to birthing centers.

[ 2000 c 93 s 37; 1995 c 369 s 5; 1986 c 266 s 82; 1951 c 168 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

State fire protection: Chapter 43.44 RCW.